Utah statutes.
48-2e-1202.   Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

